District of Columbia statutes.
28-3109

Extinguishment of cause of action.

A cause of action with respect to a fraudulent transfer or obligation under this chapter is extinguished unless action is brought:

(1)

Under section 28-3104(a)(1), within 4 years after the transfer was made or the obligation was incurred or, if later, within 1 year after the transfer or obligation was, or could reasonably have been discovered by the claimant;

(2)

Under section 28-3104(a)(2) or section 28-3105(a), within 4 years after the transfer was made or the obligation was incurred; or

(3)

Under section 28-3105(b), within 1 year after the transfer was made or the obligation was incurred.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-83, § 2, 42 DCR 6773

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28-3109.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 9 of the Uniform Fraudulent Transfer Act.